Wisconsin, session 2025, SB586.
do enact as follows:SB586,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB586,28Section 2. 20.285 (1) (fv) of the statutes is created to read:SB586,2,10920.285 (1) (fv) Tuition promise grant program. The amounts in the schedule 10for the tuition grants as specified in s. 36.50.SB586,311Section 3. 36.50 of the statutes is created to read:SB586,2,161236.50 Tuition promise grant program. (1) Grant program. The board 13shall develop and administer a tuition promise grant program to supplement the 14gap between any scholarships or grants that an eligible student receives outside of 15this program and the full cost to the eligible student of academic fees and 16segregated fees at the institution in which the student is enrolled.SB586,2,1817(2) Eligibility. (a) Subject to pars. (b) and (c), a student is eligible to receive 18grants from the program established under sub. (1) if all of the following apply:SB586,2,19191. The student is a resident of the state as determined under s. 36.27.SB586,2,21202. The student is enrolled in an on-campus program at an institution other 21than the University of Wisconsin-Madison.SB586,2,22223. The student is enrolled in his or her first bachelor’s degree program.SB586,3,214. The student’s household’s annual federal adjusted gross income is equal to 2or less than $71,000.SB586,3,435. The student meets any acceptable academic standards or additional 4requirements developed by the board.SB586,3,75(b) No grant under this section may be awarded to any person during the 6period that the person is required to register with the selective service under 50 7USC, Appendix, sections 451 to 473, if the person has not so registered.SB586,3,128(c) No grant under this section may be awarded to a student whose name 9appears on the statewide support lien docket under s. 49.854 (2) (b), unless the 10student provides to the board a payment agreement that has been approved by the 11county child support agency under s. 59.53 (5) and that is consistent with rules 12promulgated under s. 49.858 (2) (a).SB586,3,1413(3) Grant awards. (a) From the appropriation under s. 20.285 (1) (fv), the 14board may award grants to eligible students.SB586,3,1915(b) The board may award grants under this section to eligible students for 16either 8 consecutive semesters for incoming freshmen or 4 consecutive semesters for 17incoming transfer students. Summer terms are not included in the consecutive 18semester count, and the program funding may not be applied to students’ summer 19term tuition or fees.SB586,3,2120(4) Rules. The board may promulgate rules to implement and administer 21this section.SB586,422Section 4. Initial applicability.SB586,4,223(1) This act first applies to eligible students who initially enroll in an 1institution in the first fall semester beginning after the effective date of this 2subsection.SB586,4,33